Utah statutes.
70A-3-407.   Alteration.
(1)  "Alteration" means an unauthorized change in an instrument that purports
to modify in any respect the obligation of a party, or an unauthorized
addition of words or numbers or other change to an incomplete instrument
relating to the obligation of a party.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), an alteration fraudulently made
discharges a party whose obligation is affected by the alteration unless that
party assents or is precluded from asserting the alteration. No other
alteration discharges a party, and the instrument may be enforced according to
its original terms.
(3)  A payor bank or drawee paying a fraudulently altered instrument or a
person taking it for value, in good faith and without notice of the
alteration, may enforce rights with respect to the instrument according to its
original terms, or in the case of an incomplete instrument altered by
unauthorized completion, according to its terms as completed.
